Maryland, session 2025, HB0935.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–451.
(a) (1) Each middle school and high school shall develop a venue–specific
emergency action plan for all athletic facilities.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0935*

HOUSE BILL 935
(2) A venue–specific emergency action plan includes:
(i) The operation and use of automatic external defibrillators in
accordance with § 7–425 of this subtitle;
(ii) Heat acclimatization in accordance with § 7–434 of this subtitle;
(iii) Coordination of care for other emergent injuries, including
cervical spinal injury, concussion and closed head injury, major orthopedic injuries, and
severe weather for outdoor facilities; [and]
(IV) FOR HIGH SCHOOL FOOTBALL PROGRAMS ONLY, THE
PRESENCE OF ONE OF THE FOLLOWING ON–SITE DURING A GAME:
1. AN ATHLETIC TRAINER LICENSED UNDER TITLE 14,
SUBTITLE 5D OF THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE; OR
2. AN AMBULANCE STAFFED WITH THE APPROPRIATE
EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES PERSONNEL; AND
[(iv)] (V) A cardiac emergency response plan in accordance with
subsection (e) of this section; AND
(V) FOR HIGH SCHOOL FOOTBALL PROGRAMS ONLY, POLICIES
THAT MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) A venue–specific emergency action plan developed under this section shall be:
(1) Posted at each athletic facility at the school;
(2) Available on the school’s website for viewing by a student athlete’s
parent or guardian at the beginning of each school year;
(3) Distributed to each member of the coaching staff; and
(4) Rehearsed in person and interactively by all of the coaching staff of each
sport before each of their respective seasons.
(c) The provisions of a venue–specific emergency action plan for the operation and
use of automatic external defibrillators shall ensure that:
(1) An automated external defibrillator is provided on–site and is located
at or within a brief walk from an athletic practice or event on school property;

HOUSE BILL 935 3
(2) An automated external defibrillator is freely accessible during all school
functions;
(3) All members of the coaching staff are trained in the operation and use
of an automated external defibrillator; and
(4) A trained member of the coaching staff is present at all athletic
practices and events on school property.
(d) The provisions of a venue–specific emergency action plan for heat
acclimatization shall:
(1) Include guidelines for student athletes consistent with the Model Policy
for Preseason–Practice Heat Acclimatization Guidelines for Student Athletes established
under § 7–434 of this subtitle;
(2) Ensure that each school is properly prepared and equipped to initiate
cold water immersion for the treatment of exertional heat stroke;
(3) Ensure that the cooling modality is readily available to student athletes
at all athletic practices and events on school property;
(4) Ensure that all members of the coaching staff are trained in cold water
immersion; and
(5) Ensure that a trained member of the coaching staff is present at all
athletic practices and events on school property.
(e) (1) Each venue–specific emergency action plan shall include a cardiac
emergency response plan.
(2) The cardiac emergency response plan shall:
(i) Identify the appropriate school personnel to serve as the cardiac
emergency response team who will be tasked with responding to incidents involving an
individual experiencing sudden cardiac arrest or a similar life–threatening emergency
while at an athletic facility;
(ii) Coordinate with first responders in the local emergency medical
services to integrate the cardiac emergency action plan into local emergency response
protocols; and
(iii) Include, at minimum, the following evidence–based core
elements recommended by an appropriate national organization, including the American
Heart Association:

HOUSE BILL 935
1. Procedures for activating the cardiac emergency response
team during incidents involving an individual experiencing sudden cardiac arrest or a
similar life–threatening emergency while at an athletic facility; and
2. Requiring specified school personnel to have training in
first aid, cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR), and the operation and use of automated
external defibrillators, in accordance with § 7–425 of this subtitle, including cardiac
emergency response team members, athletic coaching and training staff, school nurses, and
any other individuals identified by the cardiac emergency response team.
(3) Each year, each middle school and high school shall review and update
the cardiac emergency response plan required under this subsection.
(F) (1) THE VENUE–SPECIFIC EMERGENCY ACTION PLAN FOR A HIGH
SCHOOL FOOTBALL PROGRAM SHALL INCLUDE DURING A GAME:
(I) THE PRESENCE OF A VOLUNTEER OR LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEM EMPLOYEE WHO IS ONE OF THE FOLLOWING TRAINED HEALTH CARE
PROFESSIONALS:
1. AN ATHLETIC TRAINER LICENSED UNDER TITLE 14,
SUBTITLE 5D OF THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE;
2. AN INDIVIDUAL LICENSED OR CERTIFIED TO PROVIDE
EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 13–516 OF THIS ARTICLE;
3. A NURSE, LICENSED UNDER TITLE 8 OF THE HEALTH
OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE; OR
4. A PHYSICIAN LICENSED UNDER TITLE 14 OF THE
HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE; OR
(II) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN
AMBULANCE STAFFED WITH THE APPROPRIATE EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES
PERSONNEL.
(2) THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS
SUBSECTION MAY BE SATISFIED IF AN AMBULANCE WITH THE APPROPRIATE
EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES PERSONNEL IS LOCATED WITHIN 3 DRIVING MILES
OF THE HIGH SCHOOL FOOTBALL GAME AT A FIRE, RESCUE, OR AMBULANCE
FACILITY.
(3) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT
AN AMBULANCE DESCRIBED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION FROM
RESPONDING TO AN EMERGENCY DURING THE COURSE OF A FOOTBALL GAME.

HOUSE BILL 935 5
7–452.
(a) (1) Each nonpublic middle school and high school that receives State
funding shall develop a venue–specific emergency action plan for all athletic facilities.
(2) A venue–specific emergency action plan developed by a nonpublic
school shall include:
(i) The operation and use of automated external defibrillators in a
manner consistent with the requirements of § 13–517 of this article;
(ii) Heat acclimatization in a manner consistent with the model
policy developed under § 7–434 of this subtitle;
(iii) Coordination of care for other emergent injuries, including
cervical spinal injury, concussion and closed head injury, major orthopedic injuries, and
severe weather for outdoor facilities; [and]
(iv) A cardiac emergency response plan in accordance with
subsection (e) of this section; AND
(V) FOR HIGH SCHOOL FOOTBALL PROGRAMS ONLY, POLICIES
THAT MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) A venue–specific emergency action plan developed under this section shall be:
(1) Posted at each athletic facility at the school;
(2) Available on the school’s website for viewing by a student athlete’s
parent or guardian at the beginning of each school year;
(3) Distributed to each member of the coaching staff; and
(4) Rehearsed in person and interactively by all of the coaching staff of each
sport before each of their respective seasons.
(c) The provisions of a venue–specific emergency action plan for the operation and
use of automated external defibrillators shall ensure that:
(1) An automated external defibrillator is provided on–site and is located
at or within a brief walk from an athletic practice or event on school property;
(2) An automated external defibrillator is freely accessible during all school
functions;

HOUSE BILL 935
(3) All members of the coaching staff are trained in the operation and use
of an automated external defibrillator; and
(4) A trained member of the coaching staff is present at all athletic
practices and events on school property.
(d) The provisions of a venue–specific emergency action plan for heat
acclimatization shall:
(1) Include guidelines for student athletes consistent with the Model Policy
for Preseason–Practice Heat Acclimatization Guidelines for Student Athletes established
under § 7–434 of this subtitle;
(2) Ensure that each school is properly prepared and equipped to initiate
cold water immersion for the treatment of exertional heat stroke;
(3) Ensure that the cooling modality is readily available to student athletes
at all athletic practices and events on school property;
(4) Ensure that all members of the coaching staff are trained in cold water
immersion; and
(5) Ensure that a trained member of the coaching staff is present at all
athletic practices and events on school property.
(e) (1) Each venue–specific emergency action plan shall include a cardiac
emergency response plan.
(2) The cardiac emergency response plan shall:
(i) Identify the appropriate school personnel to serve as the cardiac
emergency response team who will be tasked with responding to incidents involving an
individual experiencing sudden cardiac arrest or a similar life–threatening emergency
while at an athletic facility;
(ii) Coordinate with first responders in the local emergency medical
services to integrate the cardiac emergency action plan into local emergency response
protocols; and
(iii) Include, at minimum, the following evidence–based core
elements recommended by an appropriate national organization, including the American
Heart Association:
1. Procedures for activating the cardiac emergency response
team during incidents involving an individual experiencing sudden cardiac arrest or a
similar life–threatening emergency while at an athletic facility; and

HOUSE BILL 935 7
2. Requiring specified school personnel to have training in
first aid, cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR), and the operation and use of automated
external defibrillators, in a manner consistent with § 7–425 of this subtitle, including
cardiac emergency response team members, athletic coaching and training staff, school
nurses, and any other individuals identified by the cardiac emergency response team.
(3) Each year, each middle school and high school shall review and update
the cardiac emergency response plan required under this subsection.
(F) (1) THE VENUE–SPECIFIC EMERGENCY ACTION PLAN FOR A HIGH
SCHOOL FOOTBALL PROGRAM SHALL INCLUDE DURING A GAME:
(I) THE PRESENCE OF A VOLUNTEER OR NONPUBLIC SCHOOL
EMPLOYEE WHO IS ONE OF THE FOLLOWING TRAINED HEALTH CARE
PROFESSIONALS:
1. AN ATHLETIC TRAINER LICENSED UNDER TITLE 14,
SUBTITLE 5D OF THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE;
2. AN INDIVIDUAL LICENSED OR CERTIFIED TO PROVIDE
EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 13–516 OF THIS ARTICLE;
3. A NURSE LICENSED UNDER TITLE 8 OF THE HEALTH
OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE; OR
4. A PHYSICIAN LICENSED UNDER TITLE 14 OF THE
HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE; OR
(II) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN
AMBULANCE STAFFED WITH THE APPROPRIATE EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES
PERSONNEL.
(2) THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS
SUBSECTION MAY BE SATISFIED IF AN AMBULANCE WITH THE APPROPRIATE
EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES PERSONNEL IS LOCATED WITHIN 3 DRIVING MILES
OF THE HIGH SCHOOL FOOTBALL GAME AT A FIRE, RESCUE, OR AMBULANCE
FACILITY.
(3) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT
AN AMBULANCE DESCRIBED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION FROM
RESPONDING TO AN EMERGENCY DURING THE COURSE OF A FOOTBALL GAME.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.